Hawaii, session 2025, HB662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-359, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  A contribution by the candidate's immediate family shall not be exempt from section 11-357[, but shall be limited in the aggregate to $50,000 in any election period; provided that the aggregate amount of loans and contributions received from the candidate's immediate family does not exceed $50,000 during an election period]." SECTION 2.  Section 11-371, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  A candidate or candidate committee may receive a loan from any or all of the following: (1)  The candidate's own funds; (2)  A financial institution regulated by the State or a federally chartered depository institution and made in accordance with applicable law in the ordinary course of business; and [(3)  The candidate's immediate family in an aggregate amount not to exceed $50,000 during an election period; provided that the aggregate amount of loans and contributions received from the immediate family shall not exceed $50,000 during an election period; and (4)] (3) Persons other than the candidate[,] or a financial institution described in paragraph (2), [or the candidate's immediate family,] in an aggregate amount not to exceed $10,000 during an election period; provided that: (A)  If the $10,000 limit for loans from persons other than the [immediate family] candidate is reached, the candidate and candidate committee shall be prohibited from receiving or accepting any other loans until the $10,000 is repaid in full; and (B)  If a loan [from persons other than the candidate's immediate family] is not repaid within one year of the date that the loan is made, the candidate and candidate committee shall be prohibited from accepting any other loans. All campaign funds, including contributions subsequently received, shall be used to repay the outstanding loan in full." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.